Hawaii statutes.
[§279D-2]
Definitions. For purposes of this chapter:

"Comprehensive agreement" means the
executed agreement between the member jurisdictions or authorities of a
metropolitan planning organization concerning the organization and structure of
the metropolitan planning organization, the roles and responsibilities of its
member jurisdictions or authorities, and the provision of funding and
membership dues.

"Employees" means an executive
director of a metropolitan planning organization, and all staff of a metropolitan
planning organization.

"Member jurisdiction or authority"
means a local or state jurisdiction or a local or regional authority that has
entered into a comprehensive agreement to support the metropolitan planning
process and that is provided representation on the metropolitan planning
organization's policy board.

"Metropolitan planning organization"
means a metropolitan planning organization designated or redesignated under 23
United States Code section 134, as amended.

"Policy board" means the policy
decision-making body of a metropolitan planning organization.

"Transportation management area"
means a transportation management area identified and designated pursuant to 23
United States Code section 134, as amended. [L 2015, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next